Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1066.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 1077, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1077. Bail on appeal shall be allowed on appeal from a
judgment of conviction of a misdemeanor, or in felony cases where
the punishment is a fine only, and when made and approved shall stay
the execution of such judgment. Bail on appeal after the effective
date of this act April 17, 1969, shall not be allowed after
conviction of any of the following offenses:
1. Murder in any degree;
2. Kidnapping for purpose of extortion;
3. Robbery with a dangerous weapon;
4. Rape in any degree;
5. Arson in the first degree;
6. Shooting with intent to kill;

7. Manslaughter in the first degree;
8. Forcible sodomy;
9. Any felony conviction for which the evidence shows that the
defendant used or was in possession of a firearm or other dangerous
or deadly weapon during the commission of the offense;
10. Trafficking in illegal drugs;
11. Manufacturing a controlled dangerous substance;
12. Abuse against an intimate partner as defined by Section
60.1 of this title;
13. Abuse of a child;
14. Sexual abuse of a child; or
13. 15. Any other felony after former conviction of a felony.
The granting or refusal of bail after judgment of conviction in
all other felony cases shall rest in the discretion of the court;
provided, however, if bail is allowed, the trial court shall state
the reason therefor for granting bail.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1066 Page 2

Passed the House of Representatives the 14th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 29th day of April, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1066 Page 3